src/propernoun-sma-morph.txt
LEXICON TJØNNIN ! as NIEJTE, but with Prop tag
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Nom:i%>n          FINAL1 ;
+N+Prop+Plc:i%>n          RHyph ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Acc:i%>m       FINAL1 ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:i%>n       FINAL1 ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ill:e%>se      FINAL1 ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ine:e%>sne     FINAL1 ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ela:e%>ste     FINAL1 ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Com:%>ine      FINAL1 ;
!+N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Nom:i%>h        FINAL1 ;
!+N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Acc:%>ide      FINAL1 ;
!+N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Gen:%>i        FINAL1 ;
!+N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Ill:%>ide      FINAL1 ;
!+N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Ine:%>ine      FINAL1 ;
!+N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Ela:%>ijste    FINAL1 ;
!+N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Com:%>igujmie  FINAL1 ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:%>igyjmie  FINAL1 ; !
+N+Prop+Plc:    EVEN_ESS ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Attr:i%>n FINAL1 ;


LEXICON SNAME_NIEJTE_PLUR ! as NIEJTE, but with Prop tag
+N+Prop+Plc+Pl: NIEJTE_PL ;
+N+Prop+Plc:%>i        RHyph ;
+N+Prop+Plc:    EVEN_ESS ;
!+N+Prop+Plc+Attr:%>h FINAL1 ;

LEXICON STAABREH ! as NIEJTE, but with Prop tag
  +N+Prop+Plc:e%>        RHyph ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Nom:e%>h        FINAL1 ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Acc:%>ide      FINAL1 ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Gen:%>i        FINAL1 ;
  +N+Prop+Plc:%>i        RHyph ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Ill:%>ide      FINAL1 ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Ine:%>ine      FINAL1 ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Ela:%>ijste    FINAL1 ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Com:%>igujmie  FINAL1 ;
  +N+Prop+Plc:    EVEN_ESS ;
!+N+Prop+Plc+Attr:e%>h FINAL1 ;


LEXICON AEKTUVE
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg: BÅERUVE_SG ;
+N+Prop+Plc:uve%^DISIMP         RHyph ;
!+N+Prop+Plc+Pl: BÅERUVE_PL ;
+N+Prop+Plc:    BÅERUVE_ESS ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Attr:uve FINAL1 ;

LEXICON LAANTE-plc
land+N+Prop+Plc:land CNAME_EVENLEX_PLC-ORG ; ! Småland
laante+N+Prop+Plc:laant SNAME_NIEJTE_PLC-ORG ; ! Smålaante

LEXICON LAANTE-sur
land+N+Prop+Sur:land CNAME_EVENLEX ; ! Småland
laante+N+Prop+Sur:laant SNAME_NIEJTE ; ! Smålaante

LEXICON NAME_KONTO
+N+Prop+Org+Sg: KONTO_SG ;
+N+Prop+Org: EVEN_ESS ;
!+N+Prop+Org+Pl: KONTO_PL ;
+N+Prop+Org: RHyph ;

LEXICON ELV-plc
:^elv CNAME_EVEN-plc ;
:^elv SNAME_MAANA-plc ;
+Use/Sub:^elven CNAME_ODD-plc ;

! Consonant final names
! - - - - - - - - -

 LEXICON SAAMI_CNAME_ODD ! Names ending in stressless vowel
 +N+Prop+Plc: SAAMI_CNAME_ODD_SG ; ! name special
! +N+Prop+Plc+Pl: N_ODD_PL ;     ! normal noun
 +N+Prop+Plc:    N_ODD_ESS ;    ! normal noun
 +N+Prop+Plc+Attr: FINAL1 ;     ! name special
  
  LEXICON SAAMI_CNAME_ODD_SG
  +Sg+Nom:         FINAL1 ; ! Herodes, Aasen
           RHyph ;
  +Sg+Acc:e%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Gen:e%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
  +Sg+Ine:%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Ela:%>istie           FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Com:%>inie            FINAL1 ;

LEXICON CNAME_ODD-mal
+N+Prop+Mal: CNAME_ODD ;  

LEXICON CNAME_ODD-fem
+N+Prop+Fem: CNAME_ODD ;  

LEXICON CNAME_ODD-plc
+N+Prop+Plc: CNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG ;  

LEXICON CNAME_ODD-sur
+N+Prop+Sur: CNAME_ODD ;  

LEXICON CNAME_ODD-obj
+N+Prop+Obj: CNAME_ODD ;  

LEXICON CNAME_ODD-ani
+N+Prop+Ani: CNAME_ODD ;  

LEXICON CNAME_ODD-org
+N+Prop+Org: CNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG ;  

 LEXICON CNAME_ODD ! Names ending in stressless vowel
  CNAME_ODD_SG ; ! name special
 +Pl: CNAME_ODD_PL ;     ! name special
     N_ODD_ESS ;    ! normal noun
 +Attr: FINAL1 ;     ! name special
 
 LEXICON CNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG ! Names ending in stressless vowel
  CNAME_ODD_SG ; ! name special
! +Pl: CNAME_ODD_PL ;     ! name special
     N_ODD_ESS ;    ! normal noun
 +Attr: FINAL1 ;     ! name special

  LEXICON CNAME_ODD_SG
  +Sg+Nom:         FINAL1 ;
           RHyph ;
  +Sg+Acc:e%>m      FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Gen:e%>n      FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
  +Sg+Ine:%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Ela:%>istie           FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Com:%>inie            FINAL1 ;

LEXICON CNAME_ODD_PL
  +Nom:%>h       FINAL1 ;
  +Acc:%>idie            FINAL1 ;
  +Gen:%>i       FINAL1 ;
  +Ill:%>idie            FINAL1 ;
  +Ine:%>inie            FINAL1 ;
  +Ela:%>ijstie          FINAL1 ;
  +Com:%>igujmie FINAL1 ;
 +Com+Use/Sub:%>igyjmie FINAL1 ; !
 

 
LEXICON CNAME_ODD-LOAN ! Names ending in stressless vowel
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Nom:         FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc:         RHyph ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Acc:e%>m      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:e%>n      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ill:%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ine:%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ela:%>istie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Com:%>inie            FINAL1 ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Pl: CNAME_ODD_PL ;     ! name special
 +N+Prop+Plc:    N_ODD_ESS ;    ! normal noun
 +N+Prop+Plc+Attr: FINAL1 ;     ! name special


LEXICON CNAME_EVEN-sur ! generates
+N+Prop+Sur: CNAME_EVENLEX ;

LEXICON CNAME_EVEN-mal ! generates
+N+Prop+Mal: CNAME_EVENLEX ;

LEXICON CNAME_EVEN-fem ! generates
+N+Prop+Fem: CNAME_EVENLEX ;

LEXICON CNAME_EVEN-org
+N+Prop+Org: CNAME_EVENLEX_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON CNAME_EVEN-plc
+N+Prop+Plc: CNAME_EVENLEX_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON CNAME_EVEN-obj
+N+Prop+Obj: CNAME_EVENLEX ;

LEXICON CNAME_EVEN-ani
+N+Prop+Ani: CNAME_EVENLEX ;

LEXICON CNAME_EVEN ! Does not generate
+N+Prop: CNAME_EVENLEX ;

LEXICON CNAME_EVENLEX
 CNAME_EVEN_SG ;
+Pl: NIEJTE_PL ;
     EVEN_ESS ;
+Attr: FINAL1 ;

LEXICON CNAME_EVENLEX_PLC-ORG
 CNAME_EVEN_SG ;
!+Pl: NIEJTE_PL ;
     EVEN_ESS ;
+Attr: FINAL1 ;


  LEXICON CNAME_EVEN_SG
  +Sg+Nom:          FINAL1 ;
            RHyph ;
  +Sg+Acc:e%>m       FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Gen:e%>n       FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Ill:e%>se      FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Ine:e%>sne     FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Ela:e%>ste     FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Com:%>ine      FINAL1 ;


LEXICON CNAME_EVEN-LOAN
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Nom:          FINAL1 ;
+N+Prop+Plc:          RHyph ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Acc:e%>m       FINAL1 ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:e%>n       FINAL1 ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ill:e%>se      FINAL1 ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ine:e%>sne     FINAL1 ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ela:e%>ste     FINAL1 ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Com:%>ine      FINAL1 ;
!+N+Prop+Plc+Pl: NIEJTE_PL ;
+N+Prop+Plc:     EVEN_ESS ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Attr: FINAL1 ;

LEXICON SAAMI_CNAME_EVEN ! Names ending in stressless vowel
+N+Prop+Sur: SAAMI_CNAME_EVEN_SG ;
+N+Prop+Sur+Pl: NIEJTE_PL ;
+N+Prop+Sur:    EVEN_ESS ;
+N+Prop+Sur+Attr: FINAL1 ;

  LEXICON SAAMI_CNAME_EVEN_SG
  +Sg+Nom:          FINAL1 ;
            RHyph ;
  +Sg+Nom:e          FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Nom:e          RHyph ;
  +Sg+Acc:e%>m       FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Gen:e%>n       FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Ill:e%>se      FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Ine:e%>sne     FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Ela:e%>ste     FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Com:%>ine      FINAL1 ;


LEXICON DÅERIES
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Nom:ies             FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc:ies             RHyph ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Acc:%^1UMLas%>am      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:%^1UMLas%>an      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ill:%^1UMLas%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ine:%^1UMLas%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ela:%^1UMLas%>istie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Com:%^1UMLas%>inie            FINAL1 ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Nom:%^1UMLas%>h       FINAL1 ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Acc:%^1UMLas%>idie            FINAL1 ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Gen:%^1UMLas%>i       FINAL1 ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Ill:%^1UMLas%>idie            FINAL1 ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Ine:%^1UMLas%>inie            FINAL1 ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Ela:%^1UMLas%>ijstie          FINAL1 ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Com:%^1UMLas%>igujmie FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc:ies    N_ODD_ESS ;    ! normal noun
 +N+Prop+Plc+Attr:ies FINAL1 ;     ! name special

LEXICON TJIRREDS
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Nom:d%>%^DISIMPs             FINAL1 ;
+N+Prop+Plc:d%>%^DISIMPs             RHyph ;
+A+Sg+Acc:de%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
+A+Sg+Gen:de%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +A+Sg+Ill:d%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
+A+Sg+Ine:d%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
+A+Sg+Ela:d%>istie           FINAL1 ;
+A+Sg+Com:d%>inie            FINAL1 ;
!+A+Pl:d N_ODD_PL ;
+A:d    N_ODD_ESS ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Attr:d%>%^DISIMPs FINAL1 ;     ! name special
